North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 23. State Education Assistance.

Part 1. State Education Assistance Authority.

§ 116-201.
Purpose and definitions.

The purpose of this Article is to authorize a system of financial assistance, consisting of grants, loans, work-study or other employment, and other aids, to assist qualified students to enable them to obtain an education beyond the high school level by attending public or private educational institutions. The General Assembly has found and hereby declares that it is in the public interest and essential to the welfare and well-being of the State and to the proper growth and development of the State to foster and provide financial assistance to properly qualified students in order to help them to obtain an education beyond the high school level. The General Assembly has further found that many students who are fully qualified to enroll in appropriate educational institutions for furthering their education beyond the high school level lack the financial means and are unable, without financial assistance as authorized under this Article, to pay the cost of such education, with a consequent irreparable loss to the State of valuable talents vital to its welfare. The General Assembly has determined that the establishment of a proper system of financial assistance for such objective purpose serves a public purpose and is fully consistent with the long established policy of the State to encourage, promote and assist education to enhance economic development.

As used in this Article, the following terms shall have the following meanings unless the context indicates a contrary intent:

“Article” or “this Article” means Article 23 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes of North Carolina;

“Authority” means the State Education Assistance Authority created by this Article or, if the Authority is abolished, the board, body, commission or agency succeeding to its principal functions, or on whom the powers given by this Article to the Authority shall be conferred by law;

“Bond resolution” or “resolution” when used in relation to the issuance of bonds is deemed to mean either any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or any trust agreement or other instrument securing any bonds;

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means the obligations authorized to be issued by the Authority under this Article, which may consist of revenue bonds, revenue refunding bonds, bond anticipation notes and other notes and obligations, evidencing the Authority’s obligation to repay borrowed money from revenues, funds and other money pledged or made available therefor by the Authority under this Article;

“Eligible institution,” with respect to student loans, has the same meaning as the term has in section 1085 of Title 20 of the United States Code;

“Eligible institution,” with respect to grants and work-study programs, includes the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, all state-supported institutions organized and administered pursuant to Chapter 115A of the General Statutes and all private institutions as defined in subdivision (8) of this subsection;

“Student obligations” means student loan notes and other debt obligations evidencing loans to students which the Authority may make, take, acquire, buy, sell, endorse or guarantee under the provisions of this Article, and may include any direct or indirect interest in the whole or any part of any such notes or obligations;

“Private institution” means an institution other than a seminary, Bible school, Bible college or similar religious institution in this State that is not owned or operated by the State or any agency or political subdivision thereof, or by any combination thereof, that offers post-high school education and is accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools or, in the case of institutions that are not eligible to be considered for accreditation, accredited in those categories and by those nationally recognized accrediting agencies that the Authority may designate;

“Reserve Trust Fund” means the trust fund authorized under

G.S. 116-209

of this Article;

“State Education Assistance Authority Loan Fund” means the trust fund so designated and authorized by

G.S. 116-209

.3 of this Article;

“Student,” with respect to scholarships, grants, and work-study programs, means a resident of the State for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in

G.S. 116-143.1

and in accordance with any definitions of residency that may from time to time be prescribed by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, who, under regulations adopted by the Authority, has enrolled or will enroll in an eligible institution for the purpose of pursuing his education beyond the high school level, who is making suitable progress in his education in accordance with standards acceptable to the Authority and, for the purposes of

G.S. 116-209.19

, who has not received a bachelor’s degree, or qualified for it and who is otherwise classified as an undergraduate under those regulations that the Authority may promulgate;

“Student,” with respect to loans, means a resident of the State as defined in (11) of this subsection and an eligible student as defined in 20 U.S.C. 1071 who is enrolled in an eligible institution located in North Carolina; and

“Student loans” means loans to students defined in subdivisions (11) and (12) of this subsection to aid them in pursuing their education beyond the high school level.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1; 1971, c. 392, s. 1; c. 1244, s. 14; 1979, c. 165, s. 1; 1987, c. 227, ss. 1, 2; 2010-31, s. 17.3(b); 2013-410, s. 9.1; 2016-57, s. 2(b).

Cross References.

As to need-based scholarships for students attending private institutions of higher education, see

G.S. 116-280

et seq.

Centralized Process to Determine Residency for Tuition Purposes.

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 11.23, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a coordinated and centralized process for residency determination that enables efficiencies within the public sectors of higher education and that simplifies the process while enhancing accuracy and consistency of outcomes. The State Education Assistance Authority (SEAA) is hereby authorized to perform all functions necessary to implement the coordinated and centralized process to apply the criteria in

G.S. 116-143.1

to determine residency for tuition purposes of students who apply for admission and are admitted to a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina or a community college under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Community Colleges and for students who apply for State-funded financial aid to attend eligible private postsecondary institutions so that the process will be fully functional for terms of enrollment commencing after December 31, 2016.

“The University of North Carolina General Administration and the North Carolina Community College System shall take the necessary actions to facilitate an orderly transition from the campus-based residency determination system to the coordinated and centralized process authorized in this section. Each of the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation, the Department of Public Instruction, the Department of Commerce, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Revenue, the State Board of Elections, and the State Chief Information Officer shall expeditiously cooperate with the SEAA in verifying electronically, or by other similarly effective and efficient means, evidence submitted to the SEAA for the purposes of classifying an individual as a resident for tuition purposes. The SEAA shall consult with representatives of The University of North Carolina General Administration, the North Carolina Community College System, and the North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities in implementing the centralized process.”

Session Laws 1987, c. 738, s. 41(a), effective August 7, 1987, provided that the responsibility for the Need-Based Student Loans is transferred from the North Carolina Board for Need-Based Student Loans to the State Education Assistance Authority (SEAA) of The University of North Carolina created under Chapter 116, Article 23 of the General Statutes.

Chapter 115A, referred to in subdivision (b)(6) of this section, was repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 462, s. 1. See now Chapter 115D.

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 17.3(b), effective July 1, 2010, designated the previously existing provisions of Article 23 of Chapter 116,

G.S. 116-201

through 116-209.40, as Part 1 of Article 23 of Chapter 116, and added the Part 1 heading.

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 17.3(a), provides: “The North Carolina National Guard Tuition Assistance Program of the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety [now Department of Public Safety] is transferred to the State Education Assistance Authority. This transfer shall have all of the elements of a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2010’.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 32.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2010-2011 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2010-2011 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 32.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 33.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 8.29, as amended by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 7.20(a), as amended by Session Laws
2017-189, s. 6(m), and as amended by Session Laws
2018-5, s. 7.21, provides: “(a) Purpose. — The purpose of this section is to establish a pilot program to provide tuition assistance awards to part-time or full-time teacher assistants working in participating local school administrative units, to be administered by certain local boards of education as follows:

“(1) Beginning with the 2016-2017 fiscal year, the local boards of education of the Anson County, Franklin County, Moore County, Richmond County, and Scotland County school administrative units.

“(2) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, the local boards of education of the Alamance-Burlington Schools, Beaufort County Schools, Bertie County Schools, Duplin County Schools, Edenton-Chowan Schools, Edgecombe County Schools, Guilford County Schools, Halifax County Schools, Nash-Rocky Mount Schools, Northampton County Schools, Randolph County Schools, Tyrrell County Schools, Vance County Schools, and Washington County Schools.

“(3) Beginning with the 2018-2019 fiscal year, the local boards of education of the Alleghany County Schools, Ashe County Schools, Bladen County Schools, Cherokee County Schools, Clay County Schools, Columbus County Schools, Davidson County Schools, Graham County Schools, Greene County Schools, Jackson County Schools, Jones County Schools, Lenoir County Public Schools, Macon County Schools, McDowell County Schools, Mitchell County Schools, Public Schools of Robeson County, Swain County Schools, Yadkin County Schools, and Yancey County Schools.

“Tuition assistance awards under the program may be provided for part-time or full-time coursework toward a college degree that will result in teacher licensure. A local board of education may grant a teacher assistant academic leave to pursue coursework that may only be taken during working hours. A teacher assistant receiving an award under the program shall fulfill the student teaching requirements of an educator preparation program by working in the teacher assistant’s employing local school administrative unit. A teacher assistant shall continue to receive salary and benefits while student teaching in the local school administrative unit in accordance with
G.S. 115C-269.30(c).

“(b) Selection of applicants. — Each local board of education participating in the pilot program may select up to five teacher assistants to receive an award of up to four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600) per academic year for a period of up to four years to be used towards the cost of tuition and fees for a teacher assistant to attend an educator preparation program at an institution of higher education. Priority for awards shall be given to a teacher assistant who received a tuition assistance award for the previous academic year and who is making satisfactory academic progress towards achieving teacher licensure. The local board of education shall set criteria for the application and selection of teacher assistants to receive tuition assistance awards that includes at least the following:

“(1) The teacher assistant shall be employed by the local board of education in the local school administrative unit.

“(2) The teacher assistant shall be enrolled or provide a statement of intent to enroll in an accredited institution of higher education in North Carolina with an educator preparation program approved by the State Board of Education to pursue teacher licensure.

“(3) The teacher assistant shall be a resident of North Carolina. For purposes of this subdivision, residency shall be determined by the same standard as residency for tuition purposes pursuant to

G.S. 116-143.1

.

“(c) Endorsement of tuition assistance awards for recipients. — Each local board of education participating in the pilot program shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the institution of higher education in which a recipient of a tuition assistance award under this program is enrolled that includes procedures for at least the following:

“(1) Remittance of the award from the local board of education to the institution of higher education.

“(2) Endorsement of the funds awarded to the recipient to the institution of higher education for deposit into the account of the institution.

“(3) Return of a pro rata share of funds to the local board of education in the event a recipient (i) withdraws from the institution of higher education prior to the end of a term or (ii) the recipient’s employment with the local board of education is terminated. The return of funds shall be consistent with procedures used by the institution under federal Title IV programs.

“(d) The local boards of education participating in the pilot program for the 2016-2017 fiscal year shall jointly report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by September 1, 2017. All of the local boards of education participating in the pilot program shall jointly report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by September 1 of each year following the first full fiscal year of participation in the pilot program on the results of the pilot program, including at least the following information:

“(1) The number and amount of funds in tuition assistance awards provided to teacher assistants.

“(2) The number of teacher assistant recipients who achieved teacher licensure, including the period of time from the issue of an initial tuition assistance award to the time of achieving licensure.

“(3) The number of recipients who remained employed in the local school administrative unit after achieving teacher licensure.”

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2016.’ ”

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2016-2017 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2016-2017 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2018.’ ”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2018-2019 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2018-2019 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-410, s. 9.1, effective August 23, 2013, in subdivision (b)(1), substituted “Article 23 of Chapter 116” for “this article 23,” and deleted “presently comprising

G.S. 116-201

through 116-209.24” following “Carolina” at the end.

Session Laws 2016-57, s. 2(b), effective September 1, 2016, in subdivision (b)(11), substituted “State for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in

G.S. 116-143.1

and” for “State,” and deleted “and published in the residency manual of the Board” following “University of North Carolina.” See editor’s note for applicability.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Student Loan Bankruptcy Gap,” see 70 Duke L.J. 497 (2020).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The North Carolina State Education Assistance Authority has the power to make loans to parents of students for the purpose of paying the costs of their children’s education beyond the high school level. See opinion of Attorney General to Stan C. Broadway, Executive Director, N.C. State Education Assistance Authority, 50 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 46 (1980).

§ 116-202.
Authority may buy and sell students’ obligations; undertakings of Authority limited to revenues.

In order to facilitate vocational and college education and to promote the industrial and economic development of the State, the State Education Assistance Authority (hereinafter created) is hereby authorized and empowered to buy and sell obligations of students attending institutions of higher education or post-secondary business, trade, technical, and other vocational schools, which obligations represent loans made to such students for the purpose of obtaining training or education.

No bonds, as this term is defined in this Article, are deemed to constitute a debt of the State, or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any political subdivision, but are payable solely from the funds of the Authority. All bonds shall contain on their faces a statement to the effect that neither the State nor the Authority is obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from revenues of the Authority and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this Article shall be payable solely from funds provided under the provisions of this Article and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the Authority hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been provided under the provisions of this Article.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1; 1967, c. 955, s. 1; 1979, c. 165, s. 2; 1987, c. 227, s. 3.

§ 116-203.
Authority created as subdivision of State; appointment, terms and removal of board of directors; officers; quorum; expenses and compensation of directors.

Authority Created. — There is created and constituted a political subdivision of the State to be known as the State Education Assistance Authority (Authority) to be housed administratively within The University of North Carolina System Office for organizational, staffing, and budgetary purposes. The exercise by the Authority of the powers conferred by this Article shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential governmental function in administering a system of financial assistance to qualified students of the State. The Authority shall exercise its statutory powers independently from the System Office and the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.

Membership. — The Authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of nine members, seven of whom shall be appointed and two of whom shall be ex officio as follows:

Seven members appointed according to the following:

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall appoint the following members:

One member who shall have expertise in secondary or higher education.

One member who shall be a chief financial officer or chief administrative officer from a nonpublic school that enrolls students receiving scholarship funds pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

One member who shall have expertise in finance.

The Governor shall appoint the following members:

One member who shall have expertise in finance.

One member who shall have expertise in secondary or higher education.

One member who shall be a member of the public at large with an interest in higher education.

One member who shall be a chief financial officer from a college or university that is a member of North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities, Inc., appointed upon the recommendation of North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities, Inc.

The chief financial officer of The University of North Carolina shall serve as an ex officio member.

The chief financial officer of the North Carolina Community College System shall serve as an ex officio member.

Terms. — Members appointed pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section shall serve for a term of four years and until their successors are appointed and duly qualified. Immediately after appointment, the directors shall enter upon the performance of their duties.

Vacancies. — A vacancy in an appointment shall be filled by the appointing authority in the same manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Removal. — The appointing authority may remove any member of the board of directors appointed by that authority for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance.

Officers. — The board shall annually elect one of its members as chair and another as vice-chair. The chair, or in the chair’s absence, the vice-chair, shall preside at all meetings of the board. In the absence of both the chair and vice-chair, the board shall appoint a chair pro tempore, who shall preside at such meetings.

(f1)

Executive Director. —

The President of The University of North Carolina shall appoint the Executive Director of the Authority, who shall be the Authority’s principal executive officer, and the Executive Director shall be responsible to the President. The Executive Director shall serve as secretary to the board of directors.

Quorum. — Five directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the Authority, and no vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the Authority. The favorable vote of at least a majority of the members of the board present at any meeting is required for the adoption of any resolution or motion or for other official action.

Expenses. — The members of the board shall receive per diem and allowances as provided in

G.S. 138-5

and

G.S. 138-6

. These expenses and compensation shall be paid from funds provided under this Article, or as otherwise provided.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1; 1979, c. 165, s. 3; 2010-109, s. 1; 2021-180, s. 8A.4(a).

§ 116-204.
Powers of Authority.

The Authority is hereby authorized and empowered:

To fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect fees for its acts and undertakings.

To establish rules and regulations concerning its acts and undertakings.

To acquire, hold and dispose of personal property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties.

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this Article.

To employ, upon approval by the President of The University of North Carolina or his or her designee, consultants, attorneys, financial professionals, liaison personnel, clerical staff, and other employees and agents as may be necessary and to fix their compensation from any funds made available to the Authority through appropriations by the General Assembly, the availability of receipts, or both.

To receive and accept from any federal or private agency, corporation, association or person grants to be expended in accomplishing the objectives of the Authority, and to receive and accept from the State, from any municipality, county or other political subdivision thereof and from any other source aid or contributions of either money, property, or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made.

To sue and to be sued; to have a seal and to alter the same at its pleasure; and to make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations not inconsistent with law to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the Authority.

To do all other acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this Article; provided, however, that nothing in this Article shall be construed to empower the Authority to engage in the business of banking or insurance.

To collect loan repayments for loans awarded under the Teaching Fellows Program pursuant to G.S. 115C-363.23A if the loan repayment is outstanding for more than 30 days.

To collect loan repayments for loans awarded from the Scholarship Loan Fund for Prospective Teachers pursuant to Article 32A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes if the loan repayment is outstanding for more than 30 days.

To administer the awarding of scholarship grants to students attending nonpublic schools as provided in Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

To administer the coordinated and centralized process for determining residency for tuition and State-funded financial aid purposes that is jointly developed and implemented by The University of North Carolina, the North Carolina Community College System, and the Authority, in consultation with the North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities.

To collect loan repayments for scholarship loans awarded under the former Principal Fellows Program pursuant to Article 5C of this Chapter if the loan repayment is outstanding for more than 30 days.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1; 2002-126, s. 9.2(f); 2011-266, s. 1.38(b); 2013-360, ss. 8.29(d), 11.9; 2016-57, s. 2(c); 2019-60, s. 1(u); 2021-180, s. 8A.4(b).

Cross References.

As to the Transforming Principal Preparation Grant Program, see Part 4 of Article 23 of Chapter 116 (G.S. 116-209.70 et seq.).

Transforming Principal Preparation.

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 11.9(a)-(o), as amended by Session Laws
2016-94, s. 11A.4, as amended by Session Laws
2016-123, s. 4.3, as amended by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 10A.5(a), as amended by Session Laws
2018-5, s. 10A.4(a) and (c)-(e), as amended by Session Laws
2018-145, s. 2(c)-(d), and as amended by Session Laws
2019-60, s. 1(a), (d), (j), (k), provides:

“(a)-(j) Repealed by Session Laws
2018-5, s. 10A.4(a), effective July 1, 2018.

“(k) Licensure Process. — By June 1, 2016, the State Board of Education shall adopt a policy to provide for a specific licensure process applicable to school administrators who provide documentation to the State Board of successful completion of a principal preparation program selected for a competitive grant in accordance with this section. Licensure shall include a requirement for candidates to hold a master’s degree.

“(
l
) Revision of Program. — By September 15, 2021, the State Board of Education, in coordination with the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, shall revise, as necessary, the licensure requirements for school administrators and the standards for approval of school administrator preparation programs after evaluating the data collected in accordance with
G.S. 116-209.73 from the grant recipients, including the criteria used in selecting grant recipients and the outcomes of program completers. The State Board of Education shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by November 15, 2021, on any changes made to the licensure requirements for school administrators and the standards for approval of school administrator preparation programs in accordance with this section.

(m) Repealed by Session Laws
2019-60, s. 1(j), effective July 1, 2021.

“(n) Of the funds appropriated for this program, the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) shall be allocated to the State Education Assistance Authority to contract with the nonprofit corporation selected pursuant to subsection (e) of this section to establish and administer the program for the 2016-2017 fiscal year, and the State Education Assistance Authority may use up to five percent (5%) of those funds for administrative costs. The remaining funds appropriated for the fiscal year for this program shall be allocated to the State Education Assistance Authority to award grants to selected recipients.”

(o) Repealed by Session Laws
2019-60, s. 1(j), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 11.23, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a coordinated and centralized process for residency determination that enables efficiencies within the public sectors of higher education and that simplifies the process while enhancing accuracy and consistency of outcomes. The State Education Assistance Authority (SEAA) is hereby authorized to perform all functions necessary to implement the coordinated and centralized process to apply the criteria in

G.S. 116-143.1

to determine residency for tuition purposes of students who apply for admission and are admitted to a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina or a community college under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Community Colleges and for students who apply for State-funded financial aid to attend eligible private postsecondary institutions so that the process will be fully functional for terms of enrollment commencing after December 31, 2016.

“The University of North Carolina General Administration and the North Carolina Community College System shall take the necessary actions to facilitate an orderly transition from the campus-based residency determination system to the coordinated and centralized process authorized in this section. Each of the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation, the Department of Public Instruction, the Department of Commerce, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Revenue, the State Board of Elections, and the State Chief Information Officer shall expeditiously cooperate with the SEAA in verifying electronically, or by other similarly effective and efficient means, evidence submitted to the SEAA for the purposes of classifying an individual as a resident for tuition purposes. The SEAA shall consult with representatives of The University of North Carolina General Administration, the North Carolina Community College System, and the North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities in implementing the centralized process.”

§ 116-204.1.
Council on residency determination policies.

The State Education Assistance Authority shall establish a council comprised of representatives of The University of North Carolina, the North Carolina Community College System, and the North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities to guide and assist the Authority in formulating, developing, and implementing any policies necessary for the proper administration and maintenance of the coordinated and centralized process for determining residency for tuition and State-funded financial aid as required by this act.

History.

2016-57, s. 2(h).

§ 116-205.
Title to property; use of State lands; offices.

Title to any property acquired by the Authority shall be taken in the name of the Authority.

The State hereby consents, subject to the approval of the Governor, the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, and Council of State, to the use of any other lands or property owned by the State, which are deemed by the Authority to be necessary for its purposes.

Upon approval by The University of North Carolina System Office, the Authority may establish such offices in State-owned or rented structures as it deems appropriate for its purposes.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1; 2021-180, s. 8A.4(c).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8A.4(c), effective November 18, 2021, inserted “the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina,” following “of the Governor,” in subsection (b); and rewrote subsection (c).

§ 116-206.
Acquisition of obligations.

With the proceeds of bonds or any other funds of the Authority available therefor, the Authority may acquire from any bank, insurance company, or educational lending institution, eligible student obligations, or any interest or participation therein in such amount, at such price or prices and upon such terms and conditions as the Authority shall determine to be in the public interest and desirable to carry out the purposes of this Article. The Authority shall take such actions and require the execution of such instruments deemed appropriate by it to permit the recovery, in connection with any such obligations or any interest or participation therein acquired by the Authority, of the amount to which the Authority may be rightfully entitled, and otherwise to enforce and protect its rights and interest thereto.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1; 1967, c. 955, s. 2; 1971, c. 392, s. 2; 1987, c. 227, s. 4.

§ 116-207.
Terms of acquisitions.

The Authority shall prescribe the terms, conditions and limitations upon which it will acquire a contingent or direct interest in any obligation and such terms, conditions and limitations shall include, but without limiting the generality hereof, the interest rate payable upon such obligations, the maturities thereof, the terms for payment of principal and interest, applicable life or other insurance which may be required in connection with any such obligation and who shall pay the premiums thereon, the safekeeping of assets pledged to secure any such undertaking, and any and all matters in connection with the foregoing as will protect the assets of the Authority.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1.

§ 116-208.
Construction of Article.

The provisions of this Article shall be liberally construed to the end that its beneficial purposes may be effectuated.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1.

§ 116-209.
Reserve Trust Fund created; transfer of Escheat Fund; pledge of security interest for payment of bonds; administration.

The appropriation made to the Authority under this Article shall be used exclusively for the purpose of acquiring contingent or vested rights in obligations which it may acquire under this Article; such appropriations, payments, revenue and interest as well as other income received in connection with such obligations is hereby established as a trust fund. Such fund shall be used for the purposes of the Authority other than maintenance and operation.

The maintenance and operating expenses of the Authority shall be paid from funds specifically appropriated for such purposes. No part of the trust fund established under this section shall be expended for such purposes.

The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the assets of the Authority and shall invest them in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

and 147-69.3. All payments from the accounts thereof shall be made by him issued upon vouchers signed by such persons as are designated by the Authority. A duly attested copy of a resolution of the Authority designating such persons and bearing on its face the specimen signatures of such persons shall be filed with the State Treasurer as his authority for issuing warrants upon such vouchers.

The trust fund is designated “Reserve Trust Fund” and shall be maintained by the Authority, except as otherwise provided, pursuant to the provisions of this Article, as security for or insurance respecting any bonds or other obligations issued by the Authority under this Article. The corpus of the Escheat Fund, including all future additions other than the income, are transferred to, and become, a part of the Reserve Trust Fund and shall be accounted for, administered, invested, reinvested, used and applied as provided in Chapter 116B of the General Statutes. The Authority may pledge and vest a security interest in all or any part of the Reserve Trust Fund by resolution adopted or trust agreement approved by it as security for or insurance respecting the payment of bonds or other obligations issued under this Article. The Reserve Trust Fund shall be held, administered, invested, reinvested, used and applied as provided in any resolution adopted or trust agreement approved by the Authority, subject to the provisions of this Article and Chapter 116B of the General Statutes.

History.

1965, c. 1180, s. 1; 1979, c. 165, s. 4; c. 467, s. 8; 1987, c. 227, s. 5.

§ 116-209.1.
Provisions in conflict.

Any of the foregoing provisions of this Article which shall be in conflict with the provisions hereinbelow set forth shall be repealed to the extent of such conflict.

History.

1967, c. 1177.

§ 116-209.2.
Reserves.

The Authority may provide in any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or any trust agreement securing any bonds that proceeds of such bonds may be used to establish reserve accounts in any trustee or banking institution or otherwise as determined by the Authority, for securing such bonds and facilitating the making of student loans and acquiring student obligations, to provide for the payment of interest on such bonds for such period of time as the Authority shall determine, and for such other purposes as will facilitate the issuance of bonds at rates of interest and upon terms deemed reasonable by the Authority and will, in the Authority’s judgment, facilitate carrying out the purposes of this Article.

History.

1967, c. 1177; 1971, c. 392, s. 3.